New York, session 2025-2026, S7215.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of subdivision 6 of section 137 of 2 the correction law, as amended by chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 Except as provided in paragraphs (d) and (e) of this subdivision, the 5 superintendent of a correctional facility may keep any incarcerated 6 individual, other than incarcerated individuals under the age of eigh- 7 teen years who shall not be placed in segregated confinement for any 8 reason, confined in a cell or room, apart from the accommodations 9 provided for incarcerated individuals who are participating in programs 10 of the facility, for such period as may be necessary for maintenance of 11 order or discipline, but in any such case the following conditions shall 12 be observed: 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11447-01-5